Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2387.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-32,274 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 79-32,274. (a) For taxable years commencing after
December 31, 2020, and before January 1, 2026 2036, there shall be
allowed a credit against the tax imposed by the Kansas income tax act
and the privilege tax pursuant to K.S.A. 79-1106 et seq., and
amendments thereto, in an amount equal to 50% of the total amount
contributed during the taxable year by a taxpayer subject to income
tax pursuant to K.S.A. 79-32,110(a) or (c), and amendments thereto,
or subject to the privilege tax pursuant to K.S.A. 79-1107 and 79-1108,
and amendments thereto, to the Eisenhower foundation.
(b) The amount of such credit awarded to a taxpayer in a taxable
year pursuant to this section shall not exceed:
(1) $25,000 for any taxpayer subject to the income tax on resident
individuals imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 79-32,110(a), and amendments
thereto; or
(2) $50,000 for any taxpayer subject to the income tax on
corporations imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 79-32,110(c), and
amendments thereto, or the privilege tax on financial institutions
pursuant to K.S.A. 79-1107 and 79-1108, and amendments thereto.
(c) The aggregate amount of credits claimed pursuant to this
section shall not exceed $350,000 for any fiscal year.
(d) The credit allowed by this section shall not exceed the amount
of tax imposed under the Kansas income tax act or the privilege tax
reduced by the sum of any other credits allowable pursuant to law.
Such credit shall be deducted from the taxpayer's income or privilege
tax liability for the taxable year in which the contributions are made
by the taxpayer. The taxpayer shall not be allowed to carry over any
amount of such credit exceeding the taxpayer's income or privilege tax

HB 2387—Am. by HC 2
liability.
Section 1. Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-32,275 is hereby amended to
read as follows: 79-32,275. (a) For taxable years commencing after
December 31, 2020, and before January 1, 2026 2036, there shall be
allowed a credit against the tax imposed by the Kansas income tax act and
the privilege tax pursuant to K.S.A. 79-1106 et seq., and amendments
thereto, in an amount equal to 50% of the total amount contributed during
the taxable year by a taxpayer subject to income tax pursuant to K.S.A. 79-
32,110(a) or (c), and amendments thereto, or subject to the privilege tax
pursuant to K.S.A. 79-1107 and 79-1108, and amendments thereto, to the
friends of cedar crest association.
(b) The amount of such credit awarded to a taxpayer in a taxable year
pursuant to this section shall not exceed:
(1) $25,000 for any taxpayer subject to the income tax on resident
individuals imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 79-32,110(a), and amendments
thereto; or
(2) $50,000 for any taxpayer subject to the income tax on
corporations imposed pursuant to K.S.A. 79-32,110(c), and amendments
thereto, or the privilege tax on financial institutions pursuant to K.S.A. 79-
1107 and 79-1108, and amendments thereto.
(c) The aggregate amount of credits claimed pursuant to this section
shall not exceed $350,000 for any fiscal year.
(d) The credit allowed by this section shall not exceed the amount of
tax imposed under the Kansas income tax act or the privilege tax reduced
by the sum of any other credits allowable pursuant to law. Such credit shall
be deducted from the taxpayer's income or privilege tax liability for the
taxable year in which the contributions are made by the taxpayer. The
taxpayer shall not be allowed to carry forward any amount of such credit
exceeding the taxpayer's income or privilege tax liability.
Sec. 2. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 79-32,274 and 79-32,275 is are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 3. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.